Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART C
FACILITIES - COMMITMENT

19-2.5-1518. Commitment to department of human services.

When a juvenile is placed in a community placement by the department of human services following commitment pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103, an administrative review must be conducted every six months after the placement for as long as
the juvenile remains in a community placement under the department of human services.

When a juvenile is placed in a community placement for a period of twelve months or longer, a court of competent jurisdiction or an administrative body appointed or approved by the court that is not under the supervision of the department of human services
shall conduct a permanency hearing pursuant to the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 675 (5)(C) no later than the twelfth month of the community placement and at least every twelve months thereafter while the
juvenile remains in a community placement. At the permanency hearing, the entity conducting the hearing shall determine whether:

Continued community placement is in the best interests of the juvenile and the community;

The juvenile's safety is protected in the community placement;

Reasonable efforts have been made to finalize the juvenile's permanency plan that is in effect at that time;

Continued community placement is necessary and appropriate;

There has been compliance with the juvenile's case plan;

Progress has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes that necessitated the community placement;

There is a date projected by which the juvenile will be returned and safely maintained in the home, placed for legal guardianship, or placed in a planned and permanent living arrangement; and

Procedural safeguards to preserve parental rights have been applied in connection with the removal of the juvenile from the home, any change in the juvenile's community placement, or any determination affecting parental visitation.

The entity conducting the permanency hearing shall consult with the juvenile, in an age-appropriate manner, concerning the juvenile's permanency plan.

Parole supervision of juveniles committed to the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103, as determined by the juvenile parole board, must not exceed six months, except as otherwise provided by statute.

When a juvenile is released or released to parole supervision by the department of human services or escapes from the department, the department shall notify the committing court, the district attorney, the Colorado bureau of investigation, and the initiating
law enforcement agency. If the juvenile is on parole status, the division of youth services shall notify the juvenile parole board, pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203 (7)(b)(II), of any discharge as a matter of law, any placement
change that may impact public safety or victim safety as determined by the division of youth services, and any escape and recapture that occurs during the period of parole.

If the terms and conditions of a juvenile's parole include the condition that the juvenile attend school, the department of human services shall notify the school district in which the juvenile will be enrolled of this condition.

When a juvenile is released by the department of human services to parole supervision, the payment of any remaining restitution must be a condition of parole.

At least ninety-one days prior to expiration of commitment to the department of human services, notification must be given to the responsible person who had custody of the juvenile immediately prior to the commitment. Reasonable efforts must be made to
return custody of the juvenile to the family or responsible person who had custody of the juvenile immediately prior to the commitment, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders that custody of the juvenile is with a different
person.

When custody of a juvenile who will be under the age of eighteen years at the time of expiration of commitment cannot be determined or none of the resources described in subsection (6) of this section exist, the division of youth services shall make a
referral to the last-known county of residence of the responsible person having custody of the juvenile immediately prior to the commitment. The referral to the county must be made by the division of youth services at least ninety-one
days prior to the expiration of the juvenile's commitment. The county department of human or social services shall conduct an assessment of the juvenile's child protection needs and, pursuant to rules adopted by the state board,
provide services in the best interest of the juvenile. The division of youth services shall work in collaboration with the county department of human or social services conducting the assessment and shall provide parole supervision
services as described in section 19-2.5-1204.

If a juvenile who is committed to the department of human services escapes from a facility operated by the department or a facility with which the department contracts, the department shall not count the time the juvenile is on escape status toward completion
of the juvenile's commitment.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 697, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-921 (5) to (11) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1519. Contracts and agreements with public and private agencies.

The executive director of the department of human services shall, subject to available appropriations, enter into agreements or contracts deemed necessary and appropriate with any governmental unit or agency or private facility or provider cooperating
or willing to cooperate in a program to carry out the purposes of this article 2.5. The contracts or agreements may provide, among other things, for the type of work to be performed at a camp or other facility, the rate of payment
for such work, and other matters relating to the care and treatment of juveniles.

Placement of juveniles by the department of human services in any public or private facility not under the jurisdiction of the department shall not terminate the legal custody of the department.

The department of human services has the right to inspect all facilities used by it and to examine and consult with persons in its legal custody who have been placed in any such facility.

On and after April 1, 2004, an entity that contracts with the department of human services for the operation of a private juvenile facility shall not employ a person who is required to register pursuant to the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act",
article 22 of title 16, to work in the private juvenile facility.

For the purposes of a contract in existence as of April 1, 2004, if a contractor employs a person in a private juvenile facility who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title
16, the contractor shall ensure that the person does not have unsupervised contact with a juvenile in the facility on and after April 1, 2004. Failure to comply with this subsection (4) constitutes a breach and grounds
for termination of the contract.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 699, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-410 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1520. Private facilities for juvenile offenders - requests for proposals - rules.

The executive director of the department of human services shall adopt rules and implement a process to issue requests for proposals with respect to contracts for designing, financing, acquiring, constructing, and operating private facilities for juvenile
offenders. The process to issue requests for proposals and privatization contracts must meet the requirements set forth in part 2 of article 1 of title 17 with respect to private adult correctional facilities.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 700, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-411 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1521. Juvenile facility - contract for operation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 700, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(4) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 518, § 21, effective April 21; entire section repealed, (SB 22-211), ch. 288, p. 2064, § 3, effective May 31.

19-2.5-1522. Juveniles committed to department of human services - emergency release.

The department of human services and the judicial department shall establish guidelines for the emergency release of juveniles committed to the custody of the department of human services during periods of crisis overcrowding of facilities operated by
the department of human services. The guidelines must take into consideration the best interests of juveniles, the capacity of individual facilities, and the safety of the public.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 701, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-924 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1523. Receiving centers - designation.

The department of human services shall designate receiving centers for juvenile delinquents committed to the department pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103.

If a change is made in the designation of a receiving center by the department of human services, it shall notify the juvenile courts at least thirty-five days prior to the date that the change takes effect.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 702, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-405 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1524. Juveniles - medical benefits application assistance - county of residence - rules.

Beginning as soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 2009, no later than one hundred twenty days prior to release, commitment facility personnel or state personnel shall assist the parent or legal guardian of the following juveniles in applying
for medical assistance pursuant to part 1 or 2 of article 5 of title 25.5 or in applying to the children's basic health plan pursuant to section 25.5-8-109:

A juvenile who was receiving medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), or pursuant to the children's basic health plan pursuant to section 25.5-8-109, immediately prior to entering the juvenile commitment facility
and is likely to be terminated from receiving medical assistance while committed or is reasonably expected to meet the eligibility criteria specified in section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f), 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), or 25.5-8-109 upon release;
and

A juvenile who is committed to a juvenile commitment facility.

If a juvenile is committed or placed for fewer than one hundred twenty days, commitment facility personnel or state personnel shall make a reasonable effort to assist the juvenile's parent or legal guardian in applying for medical assistance as soon as
practicable.

The department of health care policy and financing shall provide information and training on medical assistance eligibility requirements and assistance to the personnel at each commitment facility to assist in and expedite the application process for
medical assistance for a juvenile held in custody who meets the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section.

For purposes of determining eligibility pursuant to section 25.5-4-205, a juvenile's county of residence is the county specified by the juvenile upon the juvenile's release.

The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing shall promulgate rules to simplify the processing of applications for medical assistance pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and to allow a juvenile determined to be eligible
for medical assistance to access the medical assistance upon release and thereafter. If a county department of human or social services determines that a juvenile is eligible for medical assistance, the county shall enroll
the juvenile in medical assistance or the children's basic health plan effective upon release of the juvenile. At the time of the juvenile's release, the commitment facility shall give the juvenile or the juvenile's parent
or legal guardian information and paperwork necessary for the juvenile to access medical assistance. The applicable county department of human or social services shall provide the commitment facility with the necessary
information.

Each juvenile commitment facility administrator shall attempt to enter into prerelease agreements, if appropriate, with the county department of human or social services, the state department of human services, or the department of health care policy
and financing in order to:

Simplify the processing of applications for medical assistance or for the children's basic health plan benefits pursuant to section 25.5-8-109, to enroll, effective upon release, a juvenile who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101
(1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j) or the children's basic health plan pursuant to section 25.5-8-109; and

Provide the juvenile or the juvenile's parent or legal guardian with the information and paperwork necessary to access medical assistance immediately upon release.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 702, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-418 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1525. Juveniles committed to department of human services - evaluation and placement.

Each juvenile committed to the custody of the department of human services shall be examined and evaluated by the department prior to institutional placement or other disposition.

The evaluation and examination must be conducted at a detention facility and be completed within thirty-five days. The department of human services may, by rule, determine the extent and scope of the evaluation and examination. To the extent possible
and relevant, the evidence, reports, examination, studies, and other materials utilized in a sentencing hearing conducted pursuant to section 19-2.5-1102 must also be utilized in evaluation and examination conducted pursuant
to this section. This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to an examination and evaluation conducted pursuant to section 19-2.5-1532 (1).

The examination and evaluation must include the use of an objective risk assessment that is based upon researched factors that correlate to a risk to the community. The results of the objective risk assessment must be used to help identify treatment services
for the juvenile during the juvenile's commitment and period of parole supervision.

The department of human services shall then place each juvenile in the appropriate state institution or facility as provided in section 19-2.5-1530 or 19-2.5-1519, as indicated by the examination and evaluation.

When the department of human services determines that a juvenile requires placement in a state facility for children with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as defined in article 10.5 of title 27, it shall initiate proceedings pursuant to article
10.5 of title 27 and notify the court.

When the department of human services determines that a juvenile may require treatment for a behavioral or mental health disorder, it shall conduct or have a mental health professional conduct a mental health hospital placement prescreening on the juvenile.

If the mental health hospital placement prescreening report recommends that the juvenile be evaluated, the juvenile may be transferred to a mental health facility operated by the department of human services for evaluation.

If the evaluation report states that the juvenile has a mental health disorder, as described in section 27-65-106, the department of human services shall initiate proceedings pursuant to article 65 of title 27 and notify the court.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 703, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3)(b)(III) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3231, § 33, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-922 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1526. Facility rules - academic and vocational courses - repeal.

It is the duty of the department of human services to develop rules necessary for imparting instruction, preserving health, and enforcing discipline of juveniles committed to the department of human services.

The academic courses of study and vocational training and instruction given in the facilities established by section 19-2.5-1502 and sections 19-2.5-1527 to 19-2.5-1529 must include those approved by the department of education for the instruction of
pupils in the primary and secondary schools of the state. Full credit must be given by school districts in this state for completion of any semester, term, or year of study instruction by any juvenile who has such earned credit.

The director of the division of youth services may appoint, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, a director and such other officers, teachers, instructors, counselors, and other personnel as the director considers necessary
to transact the business of the schools and may designate their duties. A person shall not be appointed as a teacher or instructor in the schools who is not qualified to serve as a teacher or instructor in the schools under the
laws of the state and the standards established by the department of education.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the department may spend money appropriated to the department by the general assembly from the general fund in House Bill 22-1329 to expand the department's career and technical education and vocational training programs
in designated juvenile facilities as follows:

Purchasing vocational program equipment and outdoor storage structures to advance the skills of juveniles in careers that juveniles can maintain once released from the custody of the department;

Updating existing physical space for learning and replacing outdated vocational and technical equipment;

Contracting with Colorado state university - Pueblo, as established in section 23-31.5-101, and other institutions of higher education, as appropriate, for mobile learning labs; and

Updating technology and computer equipment for education programming expansion.

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 704, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(4) added, (HB 22-1383), ch. 365, p. 2604, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-414 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1383, see section 1 of chapter 365, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-2.5-1527. Lookout Mountain school.

There is established at Golden, Jefferson county, a training school known as the Lookout Mountain school, under the supervision and control of the department of human services.

The school shall provide care, education, training, and rehabilitation for juveniles ten years of age or older who have been committed to the custody of the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103. In addition, the
school may provide care, education, training, and rehabilitation for any juvenile who has been sentenced to the department of corrections and is being housed in a facility operated by the department of human services pursuant to
a contract with the department of corrections pursuant to section 19-2.5-1502 (4).

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 704, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-406 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1528. Mount View school.

There is established near Morrison, Jefferson county, a training school known as the Mount View school under the supervision and control of the department of human services.

The school shall provide care, education, training, and rehabilitation for juveniles ten years of age or older who have been committed to the custody of the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103. In addition, the
school may provide care, education, training, and rehabilitation for any juvenile who has been sentenced to the department of corrections and is being housed in a facility operated by the department of human services pursuant to
a contract with the department of corrections pursuant to section 19-2.5-1502 (4).

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 705, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-407 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1529. Youth camps.

The department of human services may establish and administer youth camps. Staff at youth camps shall provide care, education, training, rehabilitation, and supervision for juveniles ten years of age or older who have been committed to the custody of
the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 705, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-408 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1530. Alternate placement.

The executive director of the department of human services may assign any juvenile placed by the department of human services in any facility established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1502, 19-2.5-1527, or 19-2.5-1528 to any other facility established by
said sections for educational training, treatment, or rehabilitation programs. The assignment and the transportation of a juvenile to and from such programs on a daily basis does not constitute a transfer or change of placement of
the juvenile.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 705, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-409 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1531. Juveniles committed to the department of human services - prohibition against the use of restraints on pregnant juveniles.

The staff of the department of human services, in restraining a female juvenile committed to the department of human services or detained in a juvenile facility, shall use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety if the staff have actual
knowledge or a reasonable belief that the juvenile is pregnant. The requirement that staff use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety must continue during postpartum recovery and transport to or from a juvenile
facility.

Staff of the department of human services or medical facility staff shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant juvenile during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if: (2) (a) (I) Staff of the department of human
services or medical facility staff shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant juvenile during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:

The medical staff determine that restraints are medically necessary for safe childbirth;

The staff of the department of human services or medical staff determine that the juvenile presents an immediate and serious risk of harm to herself, to other patients, or to medical staff; or

The staff of the department of human services determine that the juvenile poses a substantial risk of escape that cannot reasonably be reduced by the use of other existing means.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section to the contrary, under no circumstances shall staff use leg shackles or waist restraints on a juvenile during labor and delivery of the child, postpartum recovery while in a medical facility, or transport
to or from a medical facility for childbirth.

The staff of the department of human services or medical facility authorizing the use of restraints on a pregnant juvenile during labor or delivery of the child shall make a written record of the use of restraints. The record must include, at a minimum,
the type of restraint used, the circumstances that necessitated the use of the restraint, and the length of time the restraint was used. The department of human services staff shall retain the record for a minimum of five
years and shall make the record available for public inspection with individually identifying information redacted from the record unless the juvenile who is the subject of the record gives prior written consent for the
public release of the record. The written record of the use of restraint does not constitute a medical record under state or federal law.

Upon return to a department of human services facility after childbirth, the juvenile is entitled to have a member of the department of human services' medical staff present during any strip search.

When a juvenile's pregnancy is determined, the staff of the department of human services shall inform a pregnant juvenile committed to the department of human services in writing in a language and in a manner understandable to the juvenile of the provisions
of this section concerning the use of restraints and the presence of medical staff during a strip search.

The executive director of the department of human services shall ensure that the staff of the department of human services receive adequate training concerning the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 705, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-924.7 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1532. Juveniles committed to department of human services - transfers.

The executive director of the department of human services may transfer a juvenile committed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103 among the facilities established pursuant to sections 19-2.5-1502 and 19-2.5-1527 to 19-2.5-1529; except that,
before the juvenile is transferred, the juvenile shall be examined and evaluated, and the executive director shall review the evaluation before approving the transfer.

When the executive director of the department of human services finds that the welfare and protection of a juvenile or of others requires the juvenile's immediate transfer to another facility, the executive director shall make the transfer prior to having
the juvenile examined and evaluated.

A juvenile committed to the department of human services may be transferred temporarily to any state treatment facility for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities for purposes of diagnosis, evaluation,
and emergency treatment; except that a juvenile may not be transferred to a state treatment facility for persons with mental health disorders until the juvenile has received a mental health hospital placement prescreening
resulting in a recommendation that the juvenile be placed in a facility for evaluation pursuant to section 27-65-106. A juvenile committed to the department of human services as an aggravated juvenile offender pursuant
to section 19-2.5-1127 or violent juvenile offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(c) must not be transferred until the treatment facility has a secure setting in which to house the juvenile. The period of temporary
transfer pursuant to this subsection (3)(a) must not exceed sixty days.

When a juvenile has remained in the treatment facility for sixty days, the treatment facility shall determine whether the juvenile requires further treatment or services, and, if so, the treatment facility shall confer with the sending facility concerning
continued placement. If both facilities agree that the juvenile should remain in the treatment facility, the executive director of the department of human services shall be notified of the recommendation and may authorize
an additional sixty-day placement. When an additional placement is authorized, the court must be notified of the transferred placement.

During each subsequent sixty-day placement period, the juvenile shall be reevaluated by both the treatment facility and the sending facility to determine the need for continued transferred placement. The juvenile remains in transferred placement until
the facilities agree that such placement is no longer appropriate. At that time the juvenile must be transferred back to the sending facility or to any other facility that the department of human services determines to
be appropriate. The period of placement must not exceed the length of the original commitment to the department of human services unless authorized by the court after notice and a hearing.

When a juvenile is in continued transferred placement and the treatment facility and the sending facility agree that the need for placement of the juvenile is likely to continue beyond the original period of commitment to the department of human services,
the treatment facility shall initiate proceedings with the court having jurisdiction over the juvenile pursuant to article 65 of title 27 if the juvenile has a mental health disorder or pursuant to article 10.5 of title
27 if the juvenile has intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 706, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3231, § 34, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-923 as it existed prior to 2021.